Florida, session 2026, HB7015.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subsection (8) of section
287.137, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
287.137 Antitrust violations; denial or revocation of the
right to transact business with public entities; denial of
economic benefits.—
(8)
(e) This subsection is subject to the Open Government
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7015-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7015 2026
Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
repealed on October 2, 2031 2026, unless reviewed and saved from
repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. Paragraph (e) of subsection (10) of section
501.2041, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
501.2041 Unlawful acts and practices by social media
platforms.—
(10)
(e) This subsection is subject to the Open Government
Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
repealed on October 2, 2031 2026, unless reviewed and saved from
repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7015-00